pl/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pl.aff
SFX G   ywać      ująca     ywać
SFX G   ywać      ującą     ywać
SFX G   ywać      ujące     ywać
SFX G   ywać      ującej    ywać
SFX G   zać       żący      [^cdr]zać
SFX G   zać       żącym     [^cdr]zać
SFX G   zać       żącymi    [^cdr]zać
SFX G   zać       żących    [^cdr]zać
SFX G   zać       żącego    [^cdr]zać
SFX G   zać       żącemu    [^cdr]zać
SFX G   zać       żąca      [^cdr]zać
SFX G   zać       żącą      [^cdr]zać
SFX G   zać       żące      [^cdr]zać
SFX G   zać       żącej     [^cdr]zać
SFX G   ać        ejący     rzać
SFX G   ać        ejącym    rzać
SFX G   ać        ejącymi   rzać
SFX G   ać        ejących   rzać
SFX G   ać        ejącego   rzać
SFX G   ać        ejącemu   rzać
SFX G   ać        ejąca     rzać
SFX G   ać        ejącą     rzać
SFX G   ać        ejące     rzać
SFX G   ać        ejącej    rzać
SFX G   iąć       nący      giąć
SFX G   iąć       nącym     giąć
SFX G   iąć       nącymi    giąć
SFX G   iąć       nących    giąć
SFX G   iąć       nącego    giąć
SFX G   iąć       nącemu    giąć
SFX G   iąć       nąca      giąć
SFX G   iąć       nącą      giąć
SFX G   iąć       nące      giąć
SFX G   iąć       nącej     giąć
SFX G   ąć        nący      ląć
SFX G   ąć        nącym     ląć
SFX G   ąć        nącymi    ląć
SFX G   ąć        nących    ląć
SFX G   ąć        nącego    ląć
SFX G   ąć        nącemu    ląć
SFX G   ąć        nąca      ląć
SFX G   ąć        nącą      ląć
SFX G   ąć        nące      ląć
SFX G   ąć        nącej     ląć
SFX G   ć         cy        snąć
SFX G   ć         cym       snąć
SFX G   ć         cymi      snąć
SFX G   ć         cych      snąć
SFX G   ć         cego      snąć
SFX G   ć         cemu      snąć
SFX G   ć         ca        snąć
SFX G   ć         cą        snąć
SFX G   ć         ce        snąć
SFX G   ć         cej       snąć
SFX G   ć         cy        znąć
SFX G   ć         cym       znąć
SFX G   ć         cymi      znąć
SFX G   ć         cych      znąć
SFX G   ć         cego      znąć
SFX G   ć         cemu      znąć
SFX G   ć         ca        znąć
SFX G   ć         cą        znąć
SFX G   ć         ce        znąć
SFX G   ć         cej       znąć
SFX G   ieć       ący       dzieć
SFX G   ieć       ącym      dzieć
SFX G   ieć       ącymi     dzieć
SFX G   ieć       ących     dzieć
SFX G   ieć       ącego     dzieć
SFX G   ieć       ącemu     dzieć
SFX G   ieć       ąca       dzieć
SFX G   ieć       ącą       dzieć
SFX G   ieć       ące       dzieć
SFX G   ieć       ącej      dzieć
SFX G   ieć       ący       cieć
SFX G   ieć       ącym      cieć
SFX G   ieć       ącymi     cieć
SFX G   ieć       ących     cieć
SFX G   ieć       ącego     cieć
SFX G   ieć       ącemu     cieć
SFX G   ieć       ąca       cieć
SFX G   ieć       ącą       cieć
SFX G   ieć       ące       cieć
SFX G   ieć       ącej      cieć
SFX G   ieć       ący       nieć
SFX G   ieć       ącym      nieć
SFX G   ieć       ącymi     nieć
SFX G   ieć       ących     nieć
SFX G   ieć       ącego     nieć
SFX G   ieć       ącemu     nieć
SFX G   ieć       ąca       nieć
SFX G   ieć       ącą       nieć
SFX G   ieć       ące       nieć
SFX G   ieć       ącej      nieć
SFX G   eć        ący       [mp]ieć
SFX G   eć        ącym      [mp]ieć
SFX G   eć        ącymi     [mp]ieć
SFX G   eć        ących     [mp]ieć
SFX G   eć        ącego     [mp]ieć
SFX G   eć        ącemu     [mp]ieć
SFX G   eć        ąca       [mp]ieć
SFX G   eć        ącą       [mp]ieć
SFX G   eć        ące       [mp]ieć
SFX G   eć        ącej      [mp]ieć
SFX G   ieć       zący      sieć
SFX G   ieć       zącym     sieć
SFX G   ieć       zącymi    sieć
SFX G   ieć       zących    sieć
SFX G   ieć       zącego    sieć
SFX G   ieć       zącemu    sieć
SFX G   ieć       ząca      sieć
SFX G   ieć       zącą      sieć
SFX G   ieć       zące      sieć
SFX G   ieć       zącej     sieć
SFX G   eć        ący       leć
SFX G   eć        ącym      leć
SFX G   eć        ącymi     leć
SFX G   eć        ących     leć
SFX G   eć        ącego     leć
SFX G   eć        ącemu     leć
SFX G   eć        ąca       leć
SFX G   eć        ącą       leć
SFX G   eć        ące       leć
SFX G   eć        ącej      leć
SFX G   ć         jący      [ao]rzeć
SFX G   ć         jącym     [ao]rzeć
SFX G   ć         jącymi    [ao]rzeć
SFX G   ć         jących    [ao]rzeć
SFX G   ć         jącego    [ao]rzeć
SFX G   ć         jącemu    [ao]rzeć
SFX G   ć         jąca      [ao]rzeć
SFX G   ć         jącą      [ao]rzeć
SFX G   ć         jące      [ao]rzeć
SFX G   ć         jącej     [ao]rzeć
SFX G   zeć       ący       [^ao]rzeć
SFX G   zeć       ącym      [^ao]rzeć
SFX G   zeć       ącymi     [^ao]rzeć
SFX G   zeć       ących     [^ao]rzeć
SFX G   zeć       ącego     [^ao]rzeć
SFX G   zeć       ącemu     [^ao]rzeć
SFX G   zeć       ąca       [^ao]rzeć
SFX G   zeć       ącą       [^ao]rzeć
SFX G   zeć       ące       [^ao]rzeć
SFX G   zeć       ącej      [^ao]rzeć
SFX G   ć         jący      [bfmnpw]ić
SFX G   ć         jącym     [bfmnpw]ić
SFX G   ć         jącymi    [bfmnpw]ić
SFX G   ć         jących    [bfmnpw]ić
SFX G   ć         jącego    [bfmnpw]ić
SFX G   ć         jącemu    [bfmnpw]ić
SFX G   ć         jąca      [bfmnpw]ić
SFX G   ć         jącą      [bfmnpw]ić
SFX G   ć         jące      [bfmnpw]ić
SFX G   ć         jącej     [bfmnpw]ić
SFX G   ąść       ęsący     ąść
SFX G   ąść       ęsącym    ąść
SFX G   ąść       ęsącymi   ąść
SFX G   ąść       ęsących   ąść
SFX G   ąść       ęsącego   ąść
SFX G   ąść       ęsącemu   ąść
SFX G   ąść       ęsąca     ąść
SFX G   ąść       ęsącą     ąść
SFX G   ąść       ęsące     ąść
SFX G   ąść       ęsącej    ąść
SFX G   eść       osący     [^j]eść
SFX G   eść       osącym    [^j]eść
SFX G   eść       osącymi   [^j]eść
SFX G   eść       osących   [^j]eść
SFX G   eść       osącego   [^j]eść
SFX G   eść       osącemu   [^j]eść
SFX G   eść       osąca     [^j]eść
SFX G   eść       osącą     [^j]eść
SFX G   eść       osące     [^j]eść
SFX G   eść       osącej    [^j]eść
SFX G   óść       odący     óść
SFX G   óść       odącym    óść
SFX G   óść       odącymi   óść
SFX G   óść       odących   óść
SFX G   óść       odącego   óść
SFX G   óść       odącemu   óść
SFX G   óść       odąca     óść
SFX G   óść       odącą     óść
SFX G   óść       odące     óść
SFX G   óść       odącej    óść
SFX G   ć         jący      [uy]ć
SFX G   ć         jącym     [uy]ć
SFX G   ć         jącymi    [uy]ć
SFX G   ć         jących    [uy]ć
SFX G   ć         jącego    [uy]ć
SFX G   ć         jącemu    [uy]ć
SFX G   ć         jąca      [uy]ć
SFX G   ć         jącą      [uy]ć
SFX G   ć         jące      [uy]ć
SFX G   ć         jącej     [uy]ć
SFX G   łuć       olący     kłuć
SFX G   łuć       olącym    kłuć
SFX G   łuć       olącymi   kłuć
SFX G   łuć       olących   kłuć
SFX G   łuć       olącego   kłuć
SFX G   łuć       olącemu   kłuć
SFX G   łuć       oląca     kłuć
SFX G   łuć       olącą     kłuć
SFX G   łuć       olące     kłuć
SFX G   łuć       olącej    kłuć
SFX G   źć        zący      [^e]źć
SFX G   źć        zącym     [^e]źć
SFX G   źć        zącymi    [^e]źć
SFX G   źć        zących    [^e]źć
SFX G   źć        zącego    [^e]źć
SFX G   źć        zącemu    [^e]źć
SFX G   źć        ząca      [^e]źć
SFX G   źć        zącą      [^e]źć
SFX G   źć        zące      [^e]źć
SFX G   źć        zącej     [^e]źć
SFX G   eźć       ozący     ieźć
SFX G   eźć       ozącym    ieźć
SFX G   eźć       ozącymi   ieźć
SFX G   eźć       ozących   ieźć
SFX G   eźć       ozącego   ieźć
SFX G   eźć       ozącemu   ieźć
SFX G   eźć       oząca     ieźć
SFX G   eźć       ozącą     ieźć
SFX G   eźć       ozące     ieźć
SFX G   eźć       ozącej    ieźć
SFX G   źć        zący      leźć
SFX G   źć        zącym     leźć
SFX G   źć        zącymi    leźć
SFX G   źć        zących    leźć
SFX G   źć        zącego    leźć
SFX G   źć        zącemu    leźć
SFX G   źć        ząca      leźć
SFX G   źć        zącą      leźć
SFX G   źć        zące      leźć
SFX G   źć        zącej     leźć
MAP 8
MAP aą
